Utah statutes.
10-3-205.5.   At-large election of officers -- Election of commissioners or council members.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the officers of each city shall be elected in an at-large election held at the time and in the manner provided for electing municipal officers.

(2) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the governing body of a city may by ordinance provide for the election of some or all commissioners or council members, as the case may be, by district equal in number to the number of commissioners or council members elected by district.

(b) (i)  Each district shall be of substantially equal population as the other districts.

(ii)  Within six months after the Legislature completes its redistricting process, the governing body of each city that has adopted an ordinance under Subsection (2)(a) shall make any adjustments in the boundaries of the districts as may be required to maintain districts of substantially equal population.



Amended by Chapter 292, 2003 General Session

